Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5596SV (1) 91 nls/ko S.F. 2298 Section 1. Section 533A.8, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Maintain a separate bank trust account or dedicated 3 account in which all payments received from debtors for the 4 benefit of creditors shall be deposited and in which all 5 payments shall remain until a remittance is made to either the 6 debtor or the creditor. 7 Sec. 2. Section 533A.8, subsection 5, paragraph d, Code 8 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 9 Sec. 3. Section 533A.8, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 10 to read as follows: 11 6. If the debt management program is not based on a model 12 which requires the licensee or any licensee to receive money or 13 evidences thereof from the debtor to distribute to the debtorâs 14 creditors , both of the following shall apply: 15 a. The the debtor shall maintain full control of and access 16 to any moneys set aside for payment to creditors. 17 b. The licensee may not receive consideration from any third 18 party in connection with services rendered to a debtor. 19 Sec. 4. Section 533A.9, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 20 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 21 following: 22 4. If a debt management program is not based on a model that 23 requires the licensee or another licensee to receive money or 24 evidences thereof from the debtor to distribute to the debtorâs 25 creditors, a licensee may not request or receive payment of 26 any fee or consideration for debt management services provided 27 under a debt management program unless all of the following are 28 true: 29 a. The licensee has renegotiated, resolved, reduced, or 30 otherwise altered the terms of at least one debt pursuant to a 31 resolution agreement or other contractual agreement executed 32 by the debtor and the creditor. 33 b. The debtor has made at least one payment pursuant to the 34 resolution agreement or other contractual agreement entered 35 -1- LSB 5596SV (1) 91 nls/ko 1/ 3 S.F. 2298 into under paragraph âaâ . 1 c. To the extent that debts enrolled in the debt management 2 program are renegotiated, resolved, reduced, or otherwise 3 altered individually, the fee or consideration for the debt 4 management service bears the same proportional relationship to 5 the total fee or consideration for renegotiating, resolving, 6 reducing, or otherwise altering the terms of the entire debt 7 balance as the individual debt amount bears to the entire debt 8 amount. The individual debt amount and the entire debt amount 9 are those owed at the time the debt was enrolled in the debt 10 management program. The percent charged is the same for each 11 individual debt enrolled in the debt management program. 12 Sec. 5. Section 533A.9, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 13 by striking the subsection. 14 Sec. 6. Section 538A.2, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 15 by adding the following new paragraph: 16 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. A person licensed to engage in the 17 business of debt management under section 533A.2, when acting 18 within the course and scope of that license. 19